Missouri, session 2026, HB2971.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 208 and 630, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto six new
sections, to be known as sections 208.880, 208.882, 208.884, 630.465, 630.467, and 630.469,
to read as follows:
208.880. The department of social services and the department of mental health
shall jointly report to the general assembly on whether systems used to administer MO
HealthNet benefits and waiver services for persons with intellectual and developmental
disabilities are interoperable and allow for the secure electronic exchange of application
materials and the use of electronic signatures. If the systems are not interoperable and
no plans have been made to implement interoperability, the departments shall include
an estimate of the funding required to implement interoperability.
208.882. The MO HealthNet division shall ensure its durable medical equipment
provider directory is filterable by the type of supplies or equipment a provider is
authorized to furnish. The directory shall be made available in both paper and
electronic form. The MO HealthNet division shall mail a filtered list to any person upon
request. MO HealthNet division staff shall inform any person who calls the division to
inquire about durable medical equipment that the directory is available online and that
a filtered list is available to be mailed upon request.
208.884. The MO HealthNet division, in coordination with the department of
mental health, shall develop a public-facing dashboard that allows persons with
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2971 2
intellectual and developmental disabilities or their caregivers to track their status in
application, review, appeal, or waiver processes. The dashboard shall include a clearly
identified point of contact responsible for assisting users who encounter delays or
barriers.
630.465. 1. The division of developmental disabilities of the department of
mental health shall issue regular guidance, no less than quarterly, to all targeted case
management entities contracting with the division regarding waitlist procedures,
eligibility standards, and required communication with families.
2. The division shall establish a public reporting mechanism for families or
individuals to report instances in which they were incorrectly informed that they were
on a waitlist or that no funding was available. Upon verifying that a targeted case
management entity provided incorrect information as described in this subsection, the
division:
(1) For the first occurrence, shall provide a written warning and require staff
retraining within thirty days;
(2) For the second occurrence, shall issue a notice of deficiency; and
(3) For the third or subsequent occurrence, may impose suspension, revocation,
or nonrenewal of the entity's targeted case management contract.
630.467. 1. All denial notices, appeal documents, and cover letters issued by the
division of developmental disabilities of the department of mental health or any of its
regional offices shall be written in plain language. Each notice shall provide the specific
title, telephone number, and email address of the staff member to contact, along with
clear instructions for filing an appeal. The division shall review and update the
materials annually.
2. The division shall apply trauma-informed principles in the design of service
access processes, forms, websites, and communication practices. The division may
consult qualified entities to fulfill this requirement.
630.469. The division of developmental disabilities of the department of mental
health shall provide, in all reports to the general assembly, separate counts of persons on
a waiver waitlist, an interest list, or any other internal list used to track requests for
services. Each category shall be defined and explained.
✔